Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.040

Nomination by districts—Voluntary change to electoral system.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the qualified electors of each county commissioner district, and they only, shall nominate from among their own number, candidates for the office of county commissioner of such commissioner district to be voted for at the following general election. Such candidates shall be nominated in the same manner as candidates for other county and district offices are nominated in all other respects.

(2) Where the commissioners of a county composed entirely of islands with a population of less than thirty-five thousand have chosen to divide the county into unequal-sized commissioner districts pursuant to the exception provided in RCW 36.32.020, the qualified electors of the entire county shall nominate from among their own number who reside within a commissioner district, candidates for the office of county commissioner of such commissioner district to be voted for at the following general election. Such candidates shall be nominated in the same manner as candidates for other county offices are nominated in all other respects.

(3) The commissioners of any county may authorize a change to their electoral system pursuant to RCW 29A.92.040.

[ 2018 c 113 s 205; 1982 c 226 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.040. Prior: 1909 c 232 s 1; RRS s 4043.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 113: See RCW 29A.92.005 and 29A.92.900.

Effective date—1982 c 226: See note following RCW 35.21.180.